Texas statutes.
HUMAN RESOURCES CODE

TITLE 3. FACILITIES AND SERVICES FOR CHILDREN

SUBTITLE A. FACILITIES FOR CHILDREN

CHAPTER 62. DETENTION HOMES AND PARENTAL SCHOOLS

Sec. 62.001. DETENTION HOMES AND PARENTAL SCHOOLS. (a) Any county may establish detention homes and parental schools for juveniles. The commissioners court may appropriate necessary funds from the general fund of the county to establish, equip, and maintain detention homes and parental schools for the juveniles of the county.

(b) Any county in which no detention home or parental school exists may appropriate funds necessary to pay for the proper care and training of its juveniles in the detention home or parental school of any county that agrees to receive the juveniles. The cost of the care shall be agreed on by the commissioners courts of the counties concerned.

(c) If, in the opinion of the commissioners court, it is necessary to levy a special tax to establish and maintain a detention home or parental school or to pay for the care and training of juveniles as provided by Subsection (b) of this section, the commissioners court may hold a special election on the question of levying the tax. If a petition signed by 10 percent of the qualified voters of the county is submitted requesting a special election, the commissioners court shall hold the special election.

(d) All elections held under Subsection (c) of this section shall be governed by the general laws relating to elections for the levy of special school taxes.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2391, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979.

Sec. 62.002. MULTICOUNTY FACILITIES. (a) The purpose of this section is to enable counties jointly to provide better probation services and detention and diagnostic facilities for juveniles than the counties, acting singly, would be able to provide.

(b) The commissioners courts of two or more counties may enter into cooperative agreements to acquire, maintain, and operate detention and diagnostic facilities for juveniles. The counties may maintain, improve, and operate the property so acquired and all improvements thereon, and may sell or lease all or any part of the property and improvements in accordance with the terms of the cooperative agreement. The counties may accept any donation or gift made for the purpose of acquiring, maintaining, or operating the juvenile facilities.

(c) In accordance with the terms of the cooperative agreement, each county which is a party to the agreement may issue the bonds of the county as provided by Chapter 1301, Government Code, for the purpose of acquiring, maintaining, and operating the facilities for juveniles.

(d) The commissioners courts of two or more counties may enter into cooperative agreements to provide probation services for juveniles. The cooperative agreement shall set forth in detail how the probation services are to be provided and financed.

Acts 1979, 66th Leg., p. 2388, ch. 842, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1979. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 8.281, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.